Arkansas, session 2025, HB1882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2703(7), concerning the definition of
"enrollable Medicaid beneficiary population" within the Medicaid Provider-Led
Organized Care Act, is amended to read as follows:
(7) “Enrollable Medicaid beneficiary population” means a group
of individuals who are either:
(A) Members of a covered Medicaid beneficiary population;
or
(B) Members of a voluntary Medicaid beneficiary
population; or
*JMB387*
03/20/2025 3:50:31 PM JMB387

HB1882
(C) Members of a Medicaid beneficiary population
designated by the Governor and approved by the Legislative Council;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-2705, concerning excluded services
under the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The Medicaid provider-led organized care system shall exempt
services provided under the 340B Drug Pricing Program if populations enrolled
in qualified health insurance plans under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Program are designated by the Governor and approved by the Legislative
Council as an enrollable Medicaid beneficiary population.

























03/20/2025 3:50:31 PM JMB387